Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-460
Contempt toward officials.

Any commissioned officer who uses contemptuous words against the President, the Vice President, Congress, the Secretary of Defense, the Secretary of a military department, the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States, or the Governor or Legislature of any state, territory, commonwealth, or possession in which he is on duty or present shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 60, p. 1576.